Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4124
Act; how construed.

Nothing in the DNA Testing Act shall be construed to limit the circumstances under which a person may obtain DNA testing or other postconviction relief under any other provision of law.

Laws 2001, LB 659, § 9.